Idaho, session 2025, H0079.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-2110, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2110. TUITION. (1) All students of a community college shall pay
tuition that shall be fixed annually by the board of trustees not no later
than the 1st day of August 1 of each year. The tuition for full-time students
taking normal academic courses provided by the college, who are residents
of the district, shall be fixed at not less than three hundred fifty dollars
($350) per annum, and may be increased by increments of not more than ten
percent (10%) per annum to a maximum tuition of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) three thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($3,250) per an-
num. The tuition shall be, as nearly as is practicable, the annual costs of
all elements of providing the courses of instruction, including interest on
general obligation bonds, teaching, administration, maintenance, operation
and depreciation of equipment and buildings, supplies and fuel, and other
ordinary and necessary expenses of operation incurred in providing courses
by the community college, provided that the tuition of students residing
outside the district but within the county or counties wherein the district
is located shall be fixed after taking into account moneys received by the
community college district from any funds allocated to the community college
from the educational funds of the state of Idaho, other than allocations for
career technical education; and provided that the tuition of students resid-
ing outside the district and the county but within the state of Idaho shall
be fixed after taking into account moneys received from educational funds
other than career technical moneys, as referred to in this chapter, from the
state of Idaho. Receipt of moneys, as hereinbefore provided in this section,
shall be based upon on the receipts from the sources referred to during the
fiscal year preceding the fixing of the tuition. A student in a community
college shall not be deemed a resident of the district or of the county or of
the state of Idaho, unless that student is deemed a resident as defined by
section 33-2110B, Idaho Code, for the district, county or state prior to the
date of his first enrollment in the community college, and no student who was
not a resident of the district, county or state shall gain residence while
attending and enrolled in the community college. The residence of a minor
shall be deemed to be the residence of his parents or parent or guardian.
Tuition shall be payable in advance, but the board may, in its discretion,
permit tuition to be paid in installments.


(2) The board of trustees shall also fix fees for laboratory and other
special services provided by the community college and for special courses,
including, but not limited to, night school, off-campus courses, summer
school, career technical courses, as otherwise provided in this chapter, and
other special instruction provided by the community college, and nothing in
this chapter shall be deemed to control the amount of tuition for special
courses or fees for special services, as herein provided, but the same shall
be, as nearly as reasonable, sufficient to cover the cost of all elements of
providing courses as above defined described in this subsection.
(3) In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the follow-
ing definitions shall be uniformly applied. The application of these defi-
nitions shall be retroactive and prospective.
(a) "Fees" shall include all charges imposed by the governing body, to
students, as a whole or individually, in excess of tuition. Student
fees may be imposed for special courses, instruction, and service:
(i) "Special course or instruction fee" means those fees charged
for any class or educational endeavor that has unique costs beyond
a traditional college lecture class; for example, foreign lan-
guage audio or visual instruction, specialized musical instruc-
tion, computer class, art class involving supplies or audiovisual
equipment, career technical instruction, laboratory class, re-
medial instruction, team teaching, satellite transmissions,
outside instructor, professionally assisted instruction, etc.
(ii) "Special service fee" means those fees charged for activ-
ity, benefit, or assistance offered to students which that is be-
yond traditional classroom instruction; for example, student gov-
ernment support, providing of student health staff or facilities,
student union support, intramural and intercollegiate athletics,
recreational opportunities, financial aid services, graduation
expense, automobile parking, student yearbook/publication, in-
surance, registration, noncapital library user fee, etc.
Fees shall not be imposed for any capital improvements except as specif-
ically authorized in chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code.
(b) "Tuition" means a sum charged students for cost of college instruc-
tion and shall include costs associated with maintenance and operation
of physical plant, student services and institutional support.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.